Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB244.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Attorney General is the head of the Department of Law.
(2) The Department of Law shall include the following major organizational units:
(a) Department of Criminal Investigations;
1. Office of Counter-Exploitation;
a. Special Victims Division;
b. Cyber Crimes Division; and
c. Trafficking and Abuse Prevention and Prosecution Division;
2. Office of Investigative Operations;
a. Public Corruption Division;
b. Special Investigations Division; and
c. Protective Intelligence Division;
(b) Department of Criminal Litigation;
1. Office of Special Prosecutions;
2. Office of Medicaid Fraud and Abuse Control;
3. Office of Prosecutors Advisory Council; and
4. Office of Victims Advocacy;
(c) Department of Civil Litigation;
1. Office of Consumer Protection;
2. Office of Civil and Environmental Law;
a. Open Records and Meetings Division; and
b. Civil Litigation Division;
3. Office of Rate Intervention;
4. Office of Senior Protection;[ and]
5. Office of Administrative Hearings;
a. Family and Children Division;
b. Health Services Division; and
c. General Government Division; and
6. Office of Data Privacy;
(d) Office of the Solicitor General;
1. Criminal Appeals Division; and
2. Civil Appeals Division;
(e) Office of Legal Counsel;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(f) Office of Communications;
(g) Office of Management and Budget;[ and]
(h) Kentucky Office of Regulatory Relief; and
(i) Department of Child Support Services;
1. Office of Processing and Distribution;
2. Office of Program Services;
3. Office of General Counsel;
4. Office of Administrative Services; and
5. Office of Information Services.
Section 2. KRS 15.111 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of Administrative Hearings is created within the Department of Law[in the Office of Attorney
General].
(2) This office shall have the following responsibilities:
(a) Employing and maintaining a pool of hearing officers for assignment to the individual agencies at their
request, for the conduct of administrative hearings. The Attorney General's office may also employ
other staff as necessary to carry out functions and responsibilities assigned by KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) Reviewing and approving or disapproving requests from agencies for waivers from provisions of KRS
Chapter 13B;
(c) Providing training in administrative hearing procedures for hearing officers as required in KRS
13B.030, either by developing and offering the training, or by contracting with appropriate
organizations for the provision of training, or by approving training developed and submitted by the
agencies;
(d) Consulting with the Personnel Cabinet and employing agencies in the establishment of relevant and
appropriate qualifications for classes of hearing officers;
(e) [Establishing, in cooperation with the Office of Consumer Protection, a clearinghouse for complaints
concerning the administrative hearing process in Kentucky. Each complaint received shall be referred to
the agency that is the subject of the complaint, and the action of the agency to resolve the complaint
shall be noted and reported to the office;
(f) ]Reporting to the Legislative Research Commission by July 1 of each odd-numbered year, the status of
the administrative hearing process in Kentucky. The report shall include a compilation of statistical data
and other information necessary to assess the effectiveness and efficiency of hearing procedures and
recommendations for making improvements to the system. Agencies shall provide the information
requested by the Office of Administrative Hearings necessary to complete the report;
(f)[(g)] Reporting to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Office of Inspector General, for review
and investigation:
1. Any charge or case against any employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services where it
has cause to believe the employee has engaged in dishonest, unethical, or illegal conduct or
practices related to his or her job duties; or
2. Any violation of state law or administrative regulation by any organization or individual
regulated by, or contracted with, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
(g)[(h)] Conducting and providing oversight of administrative hearings as it relates to the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services.
Section 3. KRS 15.802 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The duties of the [Office of the Attorney General, ]Department of Child Support Services within the
Department of Law[Enforcement], or its designee, shall include:
(a) Serve as state agency authorized to administer Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
secs. 651 to 669;

CHAPTER 59 3
(b) Serve as the information agency as provided in the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, KRS
Chapter 407;
(c) Serve as collector of all court-ordered or administratively ordered child support payments pursuant to
Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act;
(d) Serve as the agent for enforcement of international child support obligations, and respond to requests
from foreign reciprocating countries;
(e) Establish and enforce an obligation upon receipt of a completed, notarized voluntary acknowledgment-
of-paternity form;
(f) Enforce Kentucky child support laws, including collection of court-ordered or administratively ordered
child support arrearages and prosecution of persons who fail to pay child support;
(g) Publicize the availability of services and encourage the use of these services for establishing paternity
and child support;
(h) Pay the cost of genetic testing to establish paternity, subject to recoupment from the alleged father,
when paternity is administratively or judicially determined; and obtain additional testing when an
original test is contested, upon request and advance payment by the contestant;
(i) Establish child support obligations and seek modification of judicially or administratively established
child support obligations in accordance with the child support guidelines of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky as provided under KRS 403.212;
(j) Administratively establish child support orders which shall have the same force and effect of law;
(k) Issue an administrative subpoena to secure public and private records of utility and cable companies and
asset and liability information from financial institutions for the establishment, modification, or
enforcement of a child support obligation;
(l) Impose a penalty for failure to comply with an administrative subpoena;
(m) Provide notices, copies of proceedings, and determinations of support amounts to any parties or
individuals who are applying for or receiving Title IV-D services, or who are parties to cases in which
Title IV-D services are being provided; and
(n) Issue interstate administrative subpoenas to any individual or entity for financial or other information or
documents which are needed to establish, modify, or enforce a child support obligation pursuant to Part
D of Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 651 et seq. An administrative subpoena lawfully
issued in another state to an individual or entity residing in this state shall be honored and enforced in
the Circuit Court where the individual or entity resides.
(2) The [Office of the Attorney General, ]Department of Child Support Services within the Department of
Law[Enforcement], or its designee, may promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section and
adopt forms or implement other requirements of federal law relating to interstate administrative subpoenas,
and may amend forms by technical amendment that are mandated by the federal Office of Child Support
Enforcement and incorporated by reference in administrative regulation.
(3) The Office of the Attorney General shall maintain a system to receive and process all child support payments.
The system shall include existing computer systems to record the payments. The automated system shall
include a state case registry that contains records with respect to each case in which services are being
provided by the office and each child support order established or modified in the state[ on or after October 1,
1998].
(4) The Office of the Attorney General shall establish and operate a state disbursement unit for the collection,
disbursement, and recording of payments under support orders for all Title IV-D cases and for all cases
initially issued in the state[ on or after January 1, 1994,] in which a wage withholding has been court-ordered
or administratively ordered, pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act. Establishment of the
state unit may include the designation and continuation of existing local collection units to aid efficient and
effective collection, disbursement, and recording of child support payments.
(5) After the establishment of the disbursement unit child support collection system, the Office of the Attorney
General or its designee shall serve as collector of all court-ordered or administratively ordered child support
payments pursuant to Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) Where establishment of paternity and enforcement and collection of child support is by law the responsibility
of local officials, the Office of the Attorney General shall refer cases to the appropriate official for such action.
The
office may enter into cooperative arrangements with appropriate courts and law enforcement officials to assist
the office in administering the program of child support recovery, including the entering into of financial
arrangements with such courts and officials as provided for under the provisions of federal law and
regulations. The local county attorney shall be considered the designee of the office for purposes of
administering the program of child support recovery within a county, subject to the option of the county
attorney to decline such designation. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Attorney General from taking
such action, with prior written notice, as appropriate if the terms and conditions of the cooperative agreement
are not met. When a cooperative agreement with a contracting official is canceled for good cause, the office
may not offer that cooperative agreement to that official during the official's tenure.
(7) Where the local county attorney, friend of the court, domestic relations agent, or other designee of the Office
of the Attorney General has been contracted for the purpose of administering child support enforcement
pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the contracting official shall be deemed to be representing
the office and as such does not have an attorney-client relationship with the applicant who has requested
services pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act nor with any dependent on behalf of the individuals
for whom services are sought.
(8) The Office of the Attorney General shall determine the name of each obligor who owes an arrearage of at least
two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). After notification to the obligor owing an arrearage amount of two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), the office shall transmit to the United States secretary of health and
human services the certified names of the individuals and supporting documentation for the denial, revocation,
or limitation of the obligor's passport. The office shall notify the identified obligor of the determination and the
consequences and provide an opportunity to contest the determination.
(9) The Office of the Attorney General shall determine the name of an obligor owing an arrearage and shall
indefinitely deny, suspend, or revoke a license or certification that has been issued if the person has a child
support arrearage that equals or exceeds the amount that would be owed after six (6) months of nonpayment or
fails, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with subpoenas or warrants relating to paternity or child
support proceedings as provided by 42 U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(16).
(10) The Office of the Attorney General shall forward the name of the individual to a board of licensure or board of
certification for the notification of the denial, revocation, or suspension of a driver's license, professional
license or certification, occupational license or certification, recreational license, or sporting license.
(11) The denial or suspension shall remain in effect until the child support arrearage has been eliminated or
payments on the child support arrearage are being made in accordance with a court or administrative order, the
person complies with the subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings, or the appeal
of the denial or suspension is upheld and the license is reinstated.
(12) Except for cases administered by the Office of the Attorney General under 42 U.S.C. sec. 651 et seq. which
shall be afforded the appeal process set forth by KRS 405.450(3), an individual who has a license or
certification denied, revoked, or suspended shall have the right to appeal to the licensing or certifying board.
(13) A dispute hearing shall be conducted by the Office of the Attorney General in accordance with KRS 405.450.
The only basis for a dispute hearing shall be a mistake in fact.
(14) The Office of the Attorney General shall in its discretion enter into agreements with financial institutions
doing business in the Commonwealth to develop and operate, in coordination with the financial institutions, a
data match system as required by KRS 15.844, 15.846, 15.848, and 15.850.
(15) The Office of the Attorney General may issue both intrastate and interstate administrative subpoenas to any
individual or entity for financial or other information or documents that are needed to establish, modify, or
enforce a child support obligation pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 651 et seq.
An administrative subpoena lawfully issued in another state to an individual or entity in this state shall be
honored and enforced in the Circuit Court of the county in which the individual or entity resides.
(16) The Office of the Attorney General shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement KRS 15.055.

CHAPTER 59 5
(17) The Office of the Attorney General shall compare a quarterly report provided by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet of all tort claims made against the state by individuals with the child support database
to match individuals who have a child support arrearage and may receive a settlement from the state.
(18) The Office of the Attorney General shall prepare and distribute to the office's designee for the administration
of the child support program information on child support collections and enforcement. The information shall
include a description of how child support obligations are:
(a) Established;
(b) Modified;
(c) Enforced;
(d) Collected; and
(e) Distributed.
(19) The Office of the Attorney General's designee for the administration of the child support program shall
distribute, when appropriate, the following:
(a) Information on child support collections and enforcement; and
(b) Job listings posted by employment services.
Section 4. KRS 44.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No money shall be paid to any person on a claim against the state in his or her own right, or as an assignee of
another, when the person or the person's assignor is indebted to the state or any local government. The claim,
to the extent it is allowed, shall first be credited to the account of the person indebted to the state, and if there
is any balance due the person after settling the whole demand of the state, any certified liquidated debts of any
local government shall be paid if the local government provides information concerning the liquidated debt to
the State Treasurer. If there is any balance due the person after settling the whole demand of the state or local
governments, and if there are not liquidated debts certified against the claim pursuant to KRS 44.065, that
balance shall be paid to the person.
(2) In case of multiple claims by state agencies, the claims shall be paid as follows:
(a) First, to any claim made by the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services]
for past due child support obligations;
(b) Second, to any claim filed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue, for
taxes owed the Commonwealth; and
(c) Third, to all other state agencies in the order that the claims were filed with the State Treasury.
(3) In the case of multiple claims filed by any local government, the claims shall be paid in the order that the
claims were filed with the State Treasury.
(4) No money shall be paid to any person on a claim against a local government in his or her own right, or as an
assignee of another, when the person or the person's assignor is indebted to the local government or the state.
The claim, to the extent it is allowed, shall first be credited to any debt of the person indebted to the local
government, and if there is any balance due the person after settling the whole demand of the local
government, any certified liquidated debts of the state shall be paid if the state provides the local government
with information concerning the liquidated debt. If there is any balance due the person after settling the whole
demand of the local government or the state, that balance shall be paid to the person.
(5) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health
and Family Services] with a quarterly report of all tort claims made against the state by individuals that the
Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] shall compare with the child support
database to match individuals who have a child support arrearage and may receive a settlement from the state.
(6) Each organizational unit and administrative body in the executive branch of state government, as defined in
KRS 12.010, the Court of Justice in the judicial branch of state government, and, where feasible, any local
government shall provide information to the State Treasurer concerning any debt it has referred to the
Department of Revenue for collection under KRS 45.241.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) Each agency, the Court of Justice, and, where feasible, any local government shall provide information to the
State Treasurer concerning any debt referred to the Department of Revenue for collection under KRS 45.237.
Section 5. KRS 154A.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The corporation shall conduct and administer lottery games which will result in maximization of revenues to
the Commonwealth of Kentucky while at the same time provide entertainment to its citizens. It shall be the
duty of the corporation, its employees, and the members of the board to provide for the effective operation of
lottery games which insure the integrity of the lottery and maintain the dignity of the Commonwealth and the
general welfare of its citizens. The corporation, in pursuit of the attainment of the objectives and the purposes
of this chapter, may:
(a) Sue and be sued in its corporate name;
(b) Adopt a corporate seal and a symbol;
(c) Hold copyrights, trademarks, and service marks, and enforce its rights with respect thereto;
(d) Appoint agents upon which process may be served;
(e) Enter into written agreements with one (1) or more other states for the operation, marketing, and
promotion of a joint lottery or joint lottery games;
(f) Acquire real property and make improvements thereon. These acquisitions shall be reported to the
Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for its review and determination in accordance with
KRS 45.750 to 45.810; and
(g) Make, execute, and effectuate any and all agreements or contracts including:
1. Contracts for the purchase of such goods and services as are necessary for the operation and
promotion of the state lottery. Proposed purchases of major items of equipment estimated to cost
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more and proposed purchases of items of equipment
where the estimated contract price for all the items of equipment taken together is four hundred
thousand dollars ($400,000) or more shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight
Committee for its review and determination in accordance with the provisions of KRS 45.750 to
45.810. A contract shall not be artificially divided to cause an estimated contract price to fall
below the four hundred thousand dollar ($400,000) threshold. Contracts for personal service
shall be reviewed in accordance with KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725.
2. Contracts to incur debt in its own name and enter into financing agreements with the
Commonwealth, its own agencies, or with a commercial bank, excluding the authority to issue
bonds.
(2) The corporation shall:
(a) Supervise and administer the lottery in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the
administrative regulations adopted by the board;
(b) Submit monthly and annual reports to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives containing financial statements which include but are not limited to disclosure
of gross revenues, expenses, and net proceeds for the period;
(c) Adopt by administrative regulation a system of continuous internal audits;
(d) Maintain weekly or more frequent records of lottery transactions, including distribution of tickets to
lottery retailers, revenues received, claims for prizes, prizes paid, and all other financial transactions of
the corporation;
(e) Adopt by administrative regulation a code of ethics for officers and employees of the corporation to
carry out the standards of conduct established by the provisions of this chapter;
(f) Include capital projects, as defined in KRS 45.750(1)(f), which exceed the thresholds set forth in KRS
154A.060(1)(g)1. in the budget unit request submitted by the corporation to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS 48.050. In the budget unit request submitted by the
corporation, a contingency item for acquisition of the on-line central system, all related equipment, and
any other equipment owned by vendors of the corporation relating to computer-generated lottery games
from the corporation's vendors shall be stated separately from all other equipment. Further, if the
identification of specific projects requiring the acquisition of equipment in the nature of computer

CHAPTER 59 7
systems, communications equipment and related peripheral devices, and operating system software
cannot be ascertained with absolute certainty at the time the corporation is required to submit its budget
unit request, the corporation shall be entitled to submit a general request for the equipment without
individually identifying specific projects, together with a maximum amount to be allocated for the
equipment, in the budget unit request;
(g) The Kentucky Lottery Corporation and the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and
Family Services] shall develop a system to allow the Kentucky Lottery Corporation to receive a list of
delinquent child support obligors from the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and
Family Services] on a monthly basis. The Kentucky Lottery Corporation shall withhold delinquent
amounts from prizes of winners that appear on the list. This system shall be timely and shall not create
an unavoidable delay in the payment of a lottery prize; and
(h) The Kentucky Lottery Corporation and the authority shall develop a system to allow the Kentucky
Lottery Corporation to receive on a periodic basis a list of persons declared in default of repayment
obligations under financial assistance programs in KRS Chapters 164 and 164A. The Kentucky Lottery
Corporation shall withhold from a person's prize winnings the amount of the defaulted loan and shall
transfer the amount to the authority to credit the account of the person in default. Any amount
remaining after the deduction of the loan amount shall be paid to the person.
Section 6. KRS 186.570 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet or its agent designated in writing for that purpose may deny any person an operator's license or
may suspend the operator's license of any person, or, in the case of a nonresident, withdraw the privilege of
operating a motor vehicle in this state, subject to a hearing and with or without receiving a record of conviction
of that person of a crime, if the cabinet has reason to believe that:
(a) That person has committed any offenses for the conviction of which mandatory revocation of a license
is provided by KRS 186.560;[.]
(b) That person has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle, caused, or contributed to an
accident resulting in death or injury or serious property damage;[.]
(c) That person has a mental or physical disability that makes it unsafe for him to drive upon the highways.
The Transportation Cabinet shall, by administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A, establish a medical review board to provide technical assistance in the review of the driving ability
of these persons. The board shall consist of licensed medical and rehabilitation specialists;[.]
(d) That person is an habitually reckless or negligent driver of a motor vehicle or has committed a serious
violation of the motor vehicle laws;[.]
(e) That person has been issued a license without making proper application for it, as provided in KRS
186.412 or 186.4121 and administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;[.]
(f) That person has presented false or misleading information as to the person's residency, citizenship,
religious convictions, or immigration status;[.]
(g) A person required by KRS 186.480 to take an examination has been issued a license without first
having passed the examination;[.]
(h) That person has been convicted of assault and battery resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle;[.]
(i) That person has failed to appear pursuant to a citation or summons issued by a law enforcement officer
of this Commonwealth or any other jurisdiction;[.]
(j) That person has failed to appear pursuant to an order by the court to produce proof of security required
by KRS 304.39-010 and a receipt showing that a premium for a minimum policy period of six (6)
months has been paid; or[.]
(k) That person is a habitual violator of KRS 304.39-080. For purposes of this section, a "habitual violator"
shall mean any person who has operated a motor vehicle without security on the motor vehicle as
required by Subtitle 39 of this chapter three (3) or more times within a five (5) year period, in violation
of KRS 304.99-060(2).
(2) The cabinet shall deny any person a license or shall suspend the license of an operator of a motor vehicle upon
receiving written notification from the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Services] that the person has a child support arrearage which equals or exceeds the cumulative amount which
would be owed after six (6) months of nonpayment or failure, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply
with a subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings, as provided by 42 U.S.C.
sec.[secs.] 651 et seq.[; except that any child support arrearage which exists prior to January 1, 1994, shall not
be included in the calculation to determine whether the license of an operator of a motor vehicle shall be
denied or suspended.] The denial or suspension shall continue until the arrearage has been eliminated,
payments on the child support arrearage are being made in accordance with a court or administrative order, or
the person complies with the subpoena or warrant relating to paternity or child support. Before the license may
be reinstated, proof of elimination of the child support arrearage or proof of compliance with the subpoena or
warrant relating to paternity or child support proceedings as provided by 42 U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(16) from the
court where the action is pending or the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family
Services] shall be received by the Transportation Cabinet as prescribed by administrative regulations
promulgated by the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] and the
Transportation Cabinet.
(3) The cabinet or its agent designated in writing for that purpose shall deny any person an operator's license or
shall suspend the operator's license of any person, or, in the case of a nonresident, withdraw the privilege of
operating a motor vehicle in this state:
(a) Where the person has been declared ineligible to operate a motor vehicle under KRS 532.356 for the
duration of the ineligibility, upon notification of the court's judgment; or
(b) Upon receiving written notification from the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of
Revenue, that the person is a delinquent taxpayer as provided in KRS 131.1817. The denial or
suspension shall continue until a written tax clearance has been received by the cabinet from the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (4) of this section, a person whose license is denied or suspended under this paragraph shall
have thirty (30) days from the date the cabinet mails the notice to request a hearing.
(4) The cabinet or its agent designated in writing for that purpose shall provide any person subject to the
suspension, revocation, or withdrawal of their driving privileges, under provisions of this section, an informal
hearing. Upon determining that the action is warranted, the cabinet shall notify the person in writing by
mailing the notice to the person by first-class mail to the last known address of the person. The hearing shall
be automatically waived if not requested within twenty (20) days after the cabinet mails the notice. The
hearing shall be scheduled as early as practical within twenty (20) days after receipt of the request at a time
and place designated by the cabinet. An aggrieved party may appeal a decision rendered as a result of an
informal hearing, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B.
(5) (a) The cabinet may suspend the operator's license of any resident upon receiving notice of the conviction
of that person in another state of an offense there which, if committed in this state, would be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of an operator's license. The cabinet shall not suspend an operator's
license under this paragraph if:
1. The conviction causing the suspension or revocation is more than five (5) years old;
2. The conviction is for a traffic offense other than a felony traffic offense or a habitual violator
offense; and
3. The license holder complies with the provisions of KRS 186.442.
(b) If, at the time of application for an initial Kentucky operator's license, a person's license is suspended or
revoked in another state for a conviction that is less than five (5) years old, the cabinet shall deny the
person a license until the person resolves the matter in the other state and complies with the provisions
of this chapter.
(c) The cabinet may, upon receiving a record of the conviction in this state of a nonresident driver of a
motor vehicle of any offense under the motor vehicle laws, forward a notice of that person's conviction
to the proper officer in the state of which the convicted person is a resident.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to a commercial driver's license.
(6) The Transportation Cabinet is forbidden from suspending or revoking an operator's license or assessing points
or any other form of penalty against the license holder for speeding violations or speeding convictions from

CHAPTER 59 9
other states. This subsection shall apply only to speeding violations. This section shall not apply to a person
who holds or is required to hold a commercial driver's license.
(7) Each operator's license which has been canceled, suspended, or revoked shall be surrendered to and destroyed
by the cabinet. At the end of the period of cancellation, suspension, or revocation, the license holder may
reapply under KRS 186.412 or 186.4121, after the licensee has complied with all requirements for the issuance
or reinstatement of his or her driving privilege.
(8) Insurance companies issuing motor vehicle policies in the Commonwealth shall be prohibited from raising a
policyholder's rates solely because the policyholder's driving privilege has been suspended or denied pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section.
Section 7. KRS 237.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police is authorized to issue and renew licenses to carry concealed firearms
or other deadly weapons, or a combination thereof, to persons qualified as provided in this section.
(2) An original or renewal license issued pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Be valid throughout the Commonwealth and, except as provided in this section or other specific section
of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or federal law, permit the holder of the license to carry firearms,
ammunition, or other deadly weapons, or a combination thereof, at any location in the Commonwealth;
(b) Unless revoked or suspended as provided by law, be valid for a period of five (5) years from the date of
issuance;
(c) Authorize the holder of the license to carry a concealed firearm or other deadly weapon, or a
combination thereof, on or about his or her person; and
(d) Authorize the holder of the license to carry ammunition for a firearm on or about his or her person.
(3) Prior to the issuance of an original or renewal license to carry a concealed deadly weapon, the Department of
Kentucky State Police, upon receipt of a completed application, applicable fees, and any documentation
required by this section or administrative regulation promulgated by the Department of Kentucky State Police,
shall conduct a background check to ascertain whether the applicant is eligible under 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(g)
and (n), any other applicable federal law, and state law to purchase, receive, or possess a firearm or
ammunition, or both. The background check shall include:
(a) A state records check covering the items specified in this subsection, together with any other
requirements of this section;
(b) A federal records check, which shall include a National Instant Criminal Background Check System
(NICS) check;
(c) A federal Immigration Alien Query if the person is an alien who has been lawfully admitted to the
United States by the United States government or an agency thereof; and
(d) In addition to the Immigration Alien Query, if the applicant has not been lawfully admitted to the
United States under permanent resident status, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall, if a doubt
exists relating to an alien's eligibility to purchase a firearm, consult with the United States Department
of Homeland Security, United States Department of Justice, United States Department of State, or other
federal agency to confirm whether the alien is eligible to purchase a firearm in the United States, bring a
firearm into the United States, or possess a firearm in the United States under federal law.
(4) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall issue an original or renewal license if the applicant:
(a) Is not prohibited from the purchase, receipt, or possession of firearms, ammunition, or both pursuant to
18 U.S.C. 922(g), 18 U.S.C. 922(n), or applicable federal or state law;
(b) 1. Is a citizen of the United States who is a resident of this Commonwealth;
2. Is a citizen of the United States who is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who
is on active duty, who is at the time of application assigned to a military posting in Kentucky;
3. Is lawfully admitted to the United States by the United States government or an agency thereof,
is permitted by federal law to purchase a firearm, and is a resident of this Commonwealth; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. Is lawfully admitted to the United States by the United States government or an agency thereof,
is permitted by federal law to purchase a firearm, is, at the time of the application, assigned to a
military posting in Kentucky, and has been assigned to a posting in the Commonwealth;
(c) Is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(d) Has not been committed to a state or federal facility for the abuse of a controlled substance or been
convicted of a misdemeanor violation of KRS Chapter 218A or similar laws of any other state relating
to controlled substances, within a three (3) year period immediately preceding the date on which the
application is submitted;
(e) Does not chronically and habitually use alcoholic beverages as evidenced by the applicant having two
(2) or more convictions for violating KRS 189A.010 within the three (3) years immediately preceding
the date on which the application is submitted, or having been committed as an alcoholic pursuant to
KRS Chapter 222 or similar laws of another state within the three (3) year period immediately
preceding the date on which the application is submitted;
(f) Does not owe a child support arrearage which equals or exceeds the cumulative amount which would be
owed after one (1) year of nonpayment, if the Department of Kentucky State Police has been notified of
the arrearage by the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services];
(g) Has complied with any subpoena or warrant relating to child support or paternity proceedings. If the
Department of Kentucky State Police has not been notified by the Office of the Attorney
General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] that the applicant has failed to meet this requirement,
the Department of Kentucky State Police shall assume that paternity and child support proceedings are
not an issue;
(h) Has not been convicted of a violation of KRS 508.030 or 508.080 within the three (3) years
immediately preceding the date on which the application is submitted. The commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police may waive this requirement upon good cause shown and a
determination that the applicant is not a danger and that a waiver would not violate federal law;
(i) Demonstrates competence with a firearm by successful completion of a firearms safety or training
course that is conducted by a firearms instructor who is certified by a national organization with
membership open to residents of any state or territory of the United States, which was created to
promote firearms education, safety, and the profession of firearms use and training, and to foster
professional behavior in its members. The organization shall require members to adhere to its own code
of ethics and conduct a program which certifies firearms instructors and includes the use of written
tests, in person instruction, and a component of live-fire training. These national organizations shall
include but are not limited to the National Rifle Association, the United States Concealed Carry
Association, and the National Shooting Sports Foundation. The training requirement may also be
fulfilled through any firearms safety course offered or approved by the Department of Criminal Justice
Training. The firearms safety course offered or approved by the Department of Criminal Justice
Training shall:
1. Be not more than eight (8) hours in length;
2. Include instruction on handguns, the safe use of handguns, the care and cleaning of handguns,
and handgun marksmanship principles;
3. Include actual range firing of a handgun in a safe manner, and the firing of not more than twenty
(20) rounds at a full-size silhouette target, during which firing, not less than eleven (11) rounds
must hit the silhouette portion of the target; and
4. Include information on and a copy of laws relating to possession and carrying of firearms, as set
forth in KRS Chapters 237 and 527, and the laws relating to the use of force, as set forth in KRS
Chapter 503; and
(j) Demonstrates knowledge of the law regarding the justifiable use of force by including with the
application a copy of the concealed carry deadly weapons legal handout made available by the
Department of Criminal Justice Training and a signed statement that indicates that applicant has read
and understands the handout.

CHAPTER 59 11
(5) (a) A legible photocopy or electronic copy of a certificate of completion issued by a firearms instructor
certified by a national organization or the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall constitute
evidence of qualification under subsection (4)(i) of this section.
(b) Persons qualifying under subsection (6)(d) of this section may submit with their application:
1. At least one (1) of the following paper or electronic forms or their successor forms showing
evidence of handgun training or handgun qualifications:
a. Department of Defense Form DD 2586;
b. Department of Defense Form DD 214;
c. Coast Guard Form CG 3029;
d. Department of the Army Form DA 88-R;
e. Department of the Army Form DA 5704-R;
f. Department of the Navy Form OPNAV 3591-1; or
g. Department of the Air Force Form AF 522; or
2. a. Documentary evidence of an honorable discharge; and
b. A notarized affidavit on a form provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police,
signed under penalty of perjury, stating the person has met the training requirements of
subsection (6)(d) of this section.
(6) (a) Peace officers who are currently certified as peace officers by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council
pursuant to KRS 15.380 to 15.404 and peace officers who are retired and are members of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or County Employees Retirement
System or other retirement system operated by or for a city, county, or urban-county in Kentucky shall
be deemed to have met the training requirement.
(b) Current and retired peace officers of the following federal agencies shall be deemed to have met the
training requirement:
1. Any peace officer employed by a federal agency specified in KRS 61.365;
2. Any peace officer employed by a federal civilian law enforcement agency not specified above
who has successfully completed the basic law enforcement training course required by that
agency;
3. Any military peace officer of the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, or Air Force, or a
reserve component thereof, or of the Army National Guard or Air National Guard who has
successfully completed the military law enforcement training course required by that branch of
the military;
4. Any member of the United States Coast Guard serving in a peace officer role who has
successfully completed the law enforcement training course specified by the United States Coast
Guard.
(c) Corrections officers who are currently employed by a consolidated local government, an urban-county
government, or the Department of Corrections who have successfully completed a basic firearms
training course required for their employment, and corrections officers who were formerly employed by
a consolidated local government, an urban-county government, or the Department of Corrections who
are retired, and who successfully completed a basic firearms training course required for their
employment, and are members of a state-administered retirement system or other retirement system
operated by or for a city, county, or urban-county government in Kentucky shall be deemed to have met
the training requirement.
(d) Active or honorably discharged service members in the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air
Force, or Coast Guard, or a reserve component thereof, or of the Army National Guard or Air National
Guard shall be deemed to have met the training requirement if these persons:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Successfully completed handgun training which was conducted by the United States Army,
Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, or Coast Guard, or a reserve component thereof, or of the Army
National Guard or Air National Guard; or
2. Successfully completed handgun qualification within the United States Army, Navy, Marine
Corps, Air Force, or Coast Guard, or a reserve component thereof, or of the Army Guard or Air
Force National Guard.
(7) (a) 1. A paper application for a license, or renewal of a license, to carry a concealed deadly weapon
shall be obtained from and submitted to the office of the sheriff in the county in which the person
resides.
2. An applicant, in lieu of a paper application, may submit an electronic application for a license, or
renewal of a license, to carry a concealed deadly weapon to the Department of Kentucky State
Police.
3. Persons qualifying under subsection (6)(d) of this section shall be supplied the information in
subsection (4)(i)4. of this section upon obtaining an application.
(b) 1. The completed paper application and any documentation required by this section plus an
application fee or renewal fee, as appropriate, of sixty dollars ($60) shall be presented to the
office of the sheriff of the county in which the applicant resides.
2. The sheriff shall transmit the paper application and accompanying material to the Department of
Kentucky State Police within five (5) working days.
3. Twenty dollars ($20) of the paper application fee shall be retained by the office of the sheriff for
official expenses of the office. Twenty dollars ($20) shall be sent to the Department of Kentucky
State Police with the application. Ten dollars ($10) shall be transmitted by the sheriff to the
Administrative Office of the Courts to fund background checks for youth leaders, and ten dollars
($10) shall be transmitted to the Administrative Office of the Courts to fund background checks
for applicants for concealed weapons.
(c) 1. A completed electronic application submitted in lieu of a paper application, any documentation
required by this section, and an application fee or renewal fee, as appropriate, of seventy dollars
($70) shall be presented to the Department of Kentucky State Police.
2. If an electronic application is submitted in lieu of a paper application, thirty dollars ($30) of the
electronic application fee shall be retained by the Department of Kentucky State Police. Twenty
dollars ($20) shall be sent to the office of the sheriff of the applicant's county of residence for
official expenses of the office. Ten dollars ($10) shall be transmitted to the Administrative Office
of the Courts to fund background checks for youth leaders, and ten dollars ($10) shall be
transmitted to the Administrative Office of the Courts to fund background checks for applicants
for concealed weapon carry permits.
(d) A full-time or part-time peace officer who is currently certified as a peace officer by the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council and who is authorized by his or her employer or government authority to carry a
concealed deadly weapon at all times and all locations within the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS
527.020, or a retired peace officer who is a member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System,
State Police Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, or other retirement system
operated by or for a city, county, or urban-county government in Kentucky, shall be exempt from
paying the paper or electronic application or renewal fees.
(e) The application, whether paper or electronic, shall be completed, under oath, on a form or in a manner
promulgated by the Department of Kentucky State Police by administrative regulation which shall
include:
1. a. The name, address, place and date of birth, citizenship, gender, Social Security number of
the applicant; and
b. If not a citizen of the United States, alien registration number if applicable, passport
number, visa number, mother's maiden name, and other information necessary to
determine the immigration status and eligibility to purchase a firearm under federal law of
a person who is not a citizen of the United States;

CHAPTER 59 13
2. A statement that, to the best of his or her knowledge, the applicant is in compliance with criteria
contained within subsections (3) and (4) of this section;
3. A statement that the applicant, if qualifying under subsection (6)(d) of this section, has provided:
a. At least one (1) of the forms listed in subsection (5) of this section; or
b. i. Documentary evidence of an honorable discharge; and
ii. A notarized affidavit on a form provided by the Department of Kentucky State
Police stating the person has met the training requirements of subsection (6)(d) of
this section;
4. A statement that the applicant has been furnished a copy of this section and is knowledgeable
about its provisions;
5. A statement that the applicant has been furnished a copy of, has read, and understands KRS
Chapter 503 as it pertains to the use of deadly force for self-defense in Kentucky; and
6. A conspicuous warning that the application is executed under oath and that a materially false
answer to any question, or the submission of any materially false document by the applicant,
subjects the applicant to criminal prosecution under KRS 523.030.
(8) The applicant shall submit to the sheriff of the applicant's county of residence or county of military posting if
submitting a paper application, or to the Department of Kentucky State Police if submitting an electronic
application:
(a) A completed application as described in subsection (7) of this section;
(b) A recent color photograph of the applicant, as prescribed by administrative regulation;
(c) A paper or electronic certificate or an affidavit or document as described in subsection (5) of this
section;
(d) A paper or electronic document establishing the training exemption as described in subsection (6) of
this section; and
(e) For an applicant who is not a citizen of the United States and has been lawfully admitted to the United
States by the United States government or an agency thereof, an affidavit as prescribed by
administrative regulation concerning his or her immigration status and his or her United States
government issued:
1. Permanent Resident Card I-551 or its equivalent successor identification;
2. Other United States government issued evidence of lawful admission to the United States which
includes the category of admission, if admission has not been granted as a permanent resident;
and
3. Evidence of compliance with the provisions of 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(g)(5), 18 U.S.C. sec.
922(d)(5), or 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(y)(2), and 27 C.F.R. Part 178, including, as appropriate, but not
limited to evidence of ninety (90) day residence in the Commonwealth, a valid current Kentucky
hunting license if claiming exemption as a hunter, or other evidence of eligibility to purchase a
firearm by an alien which is required by federal law or regulation.
If an applicant presents identification specified in this paragraph, the sheriff shall examine the
identification, may record information from the identification presented, and shall return the
identification to the applicant.
(9) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall, within sixty (60) days after the date of receipt of the items
listed in subsection (8) of this section if the applicant submitted a paper application, or within fifteen (15)
business days after the date of receipt of the items listed in subsection (8) of this section if the applicant
applied electronically, either:
(a) Issue the license; or
(b) Deny the application based solely on the grounds that the applicant fails to qualify under the criteria
listed in subsection (3) or (4) of this section. If the Department of Kentucky State Police denies the
application, it shall notify the applicant in writing, stating the grounds for denial and informing the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
applicant of a right to submit, within thirty (30) days, any additional documentation relating to the
grounds of denial. Upon receiving any additional documentation, the Department of Kentucky State
Police shall reconsider its decision and inform the applicant within twenty (20) days of the result of the
reconsideration. The applicant shall further be informed of the right to seek de novo review of the
denial in the District Court of his or her place of residence within ninety (90) days from the date of the
letter advising the applicant of the denial.
(10) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall maintain an automated listing of license holders and pertinent
information, and this information shall be available upon request, at all times to all Kentucky, federal, and
other states' law enforcement agencies. A request for the entire list of licensees, or for all licensees in a
geographic area, shall be denied. Only requests relating to a named licensee shall be honored or available to
law enforcement agencies. Information on applications for licenses, names and addresses, or other identifying
information relating to license holders shall be confidential and shall not be made available except to law
enforcement agencies. No request for lists of local or statewide permit holders shall be made to any state or
local law enforcement agency, peace officer, or other agency of government other than the Department of
Kentucky State Police, and no state or local law enforcement agency, peace officer, or agency of government,
other than the Department of Kentucky State Police, shall provide any information to any requester not entitled
to it by law.
(11) Within thirty (30) days after the changing of a permanent address, or within thirty (30) days after the loss,
theft, or destruction of a license, the licensee shall notify the Department of Kentucky State Police of the loss,
theft, or destruction. Failure to notify the Department of Kentucky State Police shall constitute a noncriminal
violation with a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) payable to the clerk of the District Court. No court costs
shall be assessed for a violation of this subsection. When a licensee makes application to change his or her
residence address or other information on the license, neither the sheriff nor the Department of Kentucky State
Police shall require a surrender of the license until a new license is in the office of the applicable sheriff and
available for issuance. Upon the issuance of a new license, the old license shall be destroyed by the sheriff.
(12) If a license is lost, stolen, or destroyed, the license shall be automatically invalid, and the person to whom the
same was issued may, upon payment of fifteen dollars ($15) for a paper request, or twenty-five dollars ($25)
for an electronic request submitted in lieu of a paper request, to the Department of Kentucky State Police,
obtain a duplicate, upon furnishing a notarized statement to the Department of Kentucky State Police that the
license has been lost, stolen, or destroyed.
(13) (a) The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or his or her designee in writing, shall
revoke the license of any person who becomes permanently ineligible to be issued a license or have a
license renewed under the criteria set forth in this section.
(b) The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or his or her designee in writing, shall
suspend the license of any person who becomes temporarily ineligible to be issued a license or have a
license renewed under the criteria set forth in this section. The license shall remain suspended until the
person is again eligible for the issuance or renewal of a license.
(c) Upon the suspension or revocation of a license, the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State
Police, or his or her designee in writing, shall:
1. Order any peace officer to seize the license from the person whose license was suspended or
revoked; or
2. Direct the person whose license was suspended or revoked to surrender the license to the sheriff
of the person's county of residence within two (2) business days of the receipt of the notice.
(d) If the person whose license was suspended or revoked desires a hearing on the matter, the person shall
surrender the license as provided in paragraph (c)2. of this subsection and petition the commissioner of
the Department of Kentucky State Police to hold a hearing on the issue of suspension or revocation of
the license.
(e) Upon receipt of the petition, the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police shall cause a
hearing to be held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B on the suspension or revocation of the license.
If the license has not been surrendered, no hearing shall be scheduled or held.
(f) If the hearing officer determines that the licensee's license was wrongly suspended or revoked, the
hearing officer shall order the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police to return the
license and abrogate the suspension or revocation of the license.

CHAPTER 59 15
(g) Any party may appeal a decision pursuant to this subsection to the District Court in the licensee's
county of residence in the same manner as for the denial of a license.
(h) If the license is not surrendered as ordered, the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State
Police shall order a peace officer to seize the license and deliver it to the commissioner.
(i) Failure to surrender a suspended or revoked license as ordered is a Class A misdemeanor.
(j) The provisions of this subsection relating to surrender of a license shall not apply if a court of
competent jurisdiction has enjoined its surrender.
(k) When a domestic violence order or emergency protective order is issued pursuant to the provisions of
KRS Chapter 403 against a person holding a license issued under this section, the holder of the permit
shall surrender the license to the court or to the officer serving the order. The officer to whom the
license is surrendered shall forthwith transmit the license to the court issuing the order. The license shall
be suspended until the order is terminated, or until the judge who issued the order terminates the
suspension prior to the termination of the underlying domestic violence order or emergency protective
order, in writing and by return of the license, upon proper motion by the license holder. Subject to the
same conditions as above, a peace officer against whom an emergency protective order or domestic
violence order has been issued shall not be permitted to carry a concealed deadly weapon when not on
duty, the provisions of KRS 527.020 to the contrary notwithstanding.
(14) (a) Not less than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the expiration date of the license, the Department
of Kentucky State Police shall mail to each licensee a written notice of the expiration and a renewal
form prescribed by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The outside of the envelope containing
the license renewal notice shall bear only the name and address of the applicant. No other information
relating to the applicant shall appear on the outside of the envelope sent to the applicant. The licensee
may renew his or her license on or before the expiration date by filing with the sheriff of his or her
county of residence the paper renewal form, or by filing with the Department of Kentucky State Police
an electronic renewal form in lieu of a paper renewal form, stating that the licensee remains qualified
pursuant to the criteria specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and the required renewal fee
set forth in subsection (7) of this section. The sheriff shall issue to the applicant a receipt for the paper
application for renewal of the license and shall date the receipt. The Department of Kentucky State
Police shall issue to the applicant a receipt for an electronic application for renewal of the license
submitted in lieu of a paper application for renewal and shall date the receipt.
(b) A license which has expired shall be void and shall not be valid for any purpose other than surrender to
the sheriff in exchange for a renewal license.
(c) The license shall be renewed to a qualified applicant upon receipt of the completed renewal application,
records check as specified in subsection (3) of this section, determination that the renewal applicant is
not ineligible for a license as specified in subsection (4), and appropriate payment of fees. Upon the
issuance of a new license, the old license shall be destroyed by the sheriff. A licensee who fails to file a
renewal application on or before its expiration date may renew his or her license by paying, in addition
to the license fees, a late fee of fifteen dollars ($15). No license shall be renewed six (6) months or more
after its expiration date, and the license shall be deemed to be permanently expired six (6) months after
its expiration date. A person whose license has permanently expired may reapply for licensure pursuant
to subsections (7), (8), and (9) of this section.
(15) The licensee shall carry the license at all times the licensee is carrying a concealed firearm or other deadly
weapon and shall display the license upon request of a law enforcement officer. Violation of the provisions of
this subsection shall constitute a noncriminal violation with a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25), payable to
the clerk of the District Court, but no court costs shall be assessed.
(16) Except as provided in KRS 527.020, no license issued pursuant to this section shall authorize any person to
carry a concealed firearm into:
(a) Any police station or sheriff's office;
(b) Any detention facility, prison, or jail;
(c) Any courthouse, solely occupied by the Court of Justice courtroom, or court proceeding;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Any meeting of the governing body of a county, municipality, or special district; or any meeting of the
General Assembly or a committee of the General Assembly, except that nothing in this section shall
preclude a member of the body, holding a concealed deadly weapon license, from carrying a concealed
deadly weapon at a meeting of the body of which he or she is a member;
(e) Any portion of an establishment licensed to dispense beer or alcoholic beverages for consumption on
the premises, which portion of the establishment is primarily devoted to that purpose;
(f) Any elementary or secondary school facility without the consent of school authorities as provided in
KRS 527.070, any child-caring facility as defined in KRS 199.011, any day-care center as defined in
KRS 199.894, or any certified family child-care home as defined in KRS 199.8982, except however,
any owner of a certified child-care home may carry a concealed firearm into the owner's residence used
as a certified child-care home;
(g) An area of an airport to which access is controlled by the inspection of persons and property; or
(h) Any place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited by federal law.
(17) The owner, business or commercial lessee, or manager of a private business enterprise, day-care center as
defined in KRS 199.894 or certified or licensed family child-care home as defined in KRS 199.8982, or a
health-care facility licensed under KRS Chapter 216B, except facilities renting or leasing housing, may
prohibit persons holding concealed deadly weapon licenses from carrying concealed deadly weapons on the
premises and may prohibit employees, not authorized by the employer, holding concealed deadly weapons
licenses from carrying concealed deadly weapons on the property of the employer. If the building or the
premises are open to the public, the employer or business enterprise shall post signs on or about the premises if
carrying concealed weapons is prohibited. Possession of weapons, or ammunition, or both in a vehicle on the
premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as the weapons, or ammunition, or both are not removed from
the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. A private but not a public employer may
prohibit employees or other persons holding a concealed deadly weapons license from carrying concealed
deadly weapons, or ammunition, or both in vehicles owned by the employer, but may not prohibit employees
or other persons holding a concealed deadly weapons license from carrying concealed deadly weapons, or
ammunition, or both in vehicles owned by the employee, except that the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may
prohibit an employee from carrying any weapons, or ammunition, or both other than the weapons, or
ammunition, or both issued or authorized to be used by the employee of the cabinet, in a vehicle while
transporting persons under the employee's supervision or jurisdiction. Carrying of a concealed weapon, or
ammunition, or both in a location specified in this subsection by a license holder shall not be a criminal act but
may subject the person to denial from the premises or removal from the premises, and, if an employee of an
employer, disciplinary measures by the employer.
(18) All moneys collected by the Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to this section shall be used to
administer the provisions of this section and KRS 237.138 to 237.142. By March 1 of each year, the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit reports to the
Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, indicating the
amounts of money collected and the expenditures related to this section, KRS 237.138 to 237.142, and KRS
237.115, 244.125, 527.020, and 527.070, and the administration of the provisions of this section, KRS 237.138
to 237.142, and KRS 237.115, 244.125, 527.020, and 527.070.
(19) The General Assembly finds as a matter of public policy that it is necessary to provide statewide uniform
standards for issuing licenses to carry concealed firearms and to occupy the field of regulation of the bearing
of concealed firearms to ensure that no person who qualifies under the provisions of this section is denied his
rights. The General Assembly does not delegate to the Department of Kentucky State Police the authority to
regulate or restrict the issuing of licenses provided for in this section beyond those provisions contained in this
section. This section shall be liberally construed to carry out the constitutional right to bear arms for self-
defense.
(20) (a) A person who is not a resident of Kentucky and who has a valid license issued by another state of the
United States to carry a concealed deadly weapon in that state may, subject to provisions of Kentucky
law, carry a concealed deadly weapon in Kentucky, and his or her license shall be considered as valid in
Kentucky.
(b) If a person with a valid license to carry a concealed deadly weapon issued from another state that has
entered into a reciprocity agreement with the Department of Kentucky State Police becomes a resident
of Kentucky, the license issued by the other state shall be considered as valid for the first one hundred

CHAPTER 59 17
twenty (120) days of the person's residence in Kentucky, if within sixty (60) days of moving to
Kentucky, the person completes a form promulgated by the Department of Kentucky State Police which
shall include:
1. A signed and notarized statement averring that to the best of his or her knowledge the person's
license to carry a concealed deadly weapon is valid and in compliance with applicable out-of-
state law, and has not been revoked or suspended for any reason except for valid forfeiture due to
departure from the issuing state;
2. The person's name, date of birth, citizenship, gender, Social Security number if applicable, proof
that he or she is a citizen of the United States, a permanent resident of the United States, or
otherwise lawfully present in the United States, former out-of-state address, current address
within the state of Kentucky, date on which Kentucky residence began, state which issued the
concealed carry license, the issuing state's concealed carry license number, and the state of
issuance of license; and
3. A photocopy of the person's out-of-state license to carry a concealed deadly weapon.
(c) Within sixty (60) days of moving to Kentucky, the person shall deliver the form and accompanying
documents by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address indicated on the form
provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to this subsection.
(d) The out-of-state concealed carry license shall become invalid in Kentucky upon the earlier of:
1. The out-of-state person having resided in Kentucky for more than one hundred twenty (120)
days; or
2. The person being issued a Kentucky concealed deadly weapon license pursuant to this section.
(e) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall,[ not later than thirty (30) days after July 15, 1998, and]
not less than once every twelve (12) months[ thereafter], make written inquiry of the concealed deadly
weapon carrying licensing authorities in each other state as to whether a Kentucky resident may carry a
concealed deadly weapon in their state based upon having a valid Kentucky concealed deadly weapon
license, or whether a Kentucky resident may apply for a concealed deadly weapon carrying license in
that state based upon having a valid Kentucky concealed deadly weapon license. The Department of
Kentucky State Police shall attempt to secure from each other state permission for Kentucky residents
who hold a valid Kentucky concealed deadly weapon license to carry concealed deadly weapons in that
state, either on the basis of the Kentucky license or on the basis that the Kentucky license is sufficient to
permit the issuance of a similar license by the other state. The Department of Kentucky State Police
shall enter into a written reciprocity agreement with the appropriate agency in each state that agrees to
permit Kentucky residents to carry concealed deadly weapons in the other state on the basis of a
Kentucky-issued concealed deadly weapon license or that will issue a license to carry concealed deadly
weapons in the other state based upon a Kentucky concealed deadly weapon license. If a reciprocity
agreement is reached, the requirement to recontact the other state each twelve (12) months shall be
eliminated as long as the reciprocity agreement is in force. The information shall be a public record and
shall be available to individual requesters free of charge for the first copy and at the normal rate for
open records requests for additional copies.
(21) By March 1 of each year, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall submit a statistical report to the
Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, indicating the number
of licenses issued, revoked, suspended, and denied since the previous report and in total and also the number
of licenses currently valid. The report shall also include the number of arrests, convictions, and types of crimes
committed since the previous report by individuals licensed to carry concealed weapons.
(22) The following provisions shall apply to concealed deadly weapon training classes conducted by the
Department of Criminal Justice Training or any other agency pursuant to this section:
(a) No concealed deadly weapon instructor trainer shall have his or her certification as a concealed deadly
weapon instructor trainer reduced to that of instructor or revoked except after a hearing conducted
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B in which the instructor is found to have committed an act in violation of
the applicable statutes or administrative regulations;
(b) No concealed deadly weapon instructor shall have his or her certification as a concealed deadly weapon
instructor license suspended or revoked except after a hearing conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
in which the instructor is found to have committed an act in violation of the applicable statutes or
administrative regulations;
(c) The department shall not require prior notification that an applicant class or instructor class will be
conducted by a certified instructor or instructor trainer;
(d) Each concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer who teaches a concealed deadly weapon
applicant or concealed deadly weapon instructor class shall supply the Department of Criminal Justice
Training with a class roster indicating which students enrolled and successfully completed the class, and
which contains the name and address of each student, within five (5) working days of the completion of
the class. The information may be sent by mail, facsimile, email[e-mail], or other method which will
result in the receipt of or production of a hard copy of the information. The postmark, facsimile date, or
e-mail date shall be considered as the date on which the notice was sent. Concealed deadly weapon
class applicant, instructor, and instructor trainer information and records shall be confidential. The
department may release to any person or organization the name, address, and telephone number of a
concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer if that instructor or instructor trainer authorizes
the release of the information in writing. The department shall include on any application for an
instructor or instructor trainer certification a statement that the applicant either does or does not desire
the applicant's name, address, and telephone number to be made public;
(e) An instructor trainer who assists in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon instructor class or
concealed deadly weapon applicant class for more than two (2) hours shall be considered as to have
taught a class for the purpose of maintaining his or her certification. All class record forms shall include
spaces for assistant instructors to sign and certify that they have assisted in the conduct of a concealed
deadly weapon instructor or concealed deadly weapon class;
(f) An instructor who assists in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon applicant class for more than
two (2) hours shall be considered as to have taught a class for the purpose of maintaining his or her
license. All class record forms shall include spaces for assistant instructors to sign and certify that they
have assisted in the conduct of a concealed deadly weapon class;
(g) If the Department of Criminal Justice Training believes that a firearms instructor trainer or certified
firearms instructor has not in fact complied with the requirements for teaching a certified firearms
instructor or applicant class by not teaching the class as specified in KRS 237.126, or who has taught an
insufficient class as specified in KRS 237.128, the department shall send to each person who has been
listed as successfully completing the concealed deadly weapon applicant class or concealed deadly
weapon instructor class a verification form on which the time, date, date of range firing if different from
the date on which the class was conducted, location, and instructor of the class is listed by the
department and which requires the person to answer "yes" or "no" to specific questions regarding the
conduct of the training class. The form shall be completed under oath and shall be returned to the
Department of Criminal Justice Training not later than forty-five (45) days after its receipt. A person
who fails to complete the form, to sign the form, or to return the form to the Department of Criminal
Justice Training within the time frame specified in this section or who, as a result of information on the
returned form, is determined by the Department of Criminal Justice Training, following a hearing
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, to not have received the training required by law shall have his or her
concealed deadly weapon license revoked by the Department of Kentucky State Police, following a
hearing conducted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, at
which hearing the person is found to have violated the provisions of this section or who has been found
not to have received the training required by law;
(h) The department shall annually, not later than December 31 of each year, report to the Legislative
Research Commission:
1. The number of firearms instructor trainers and certified firearms instructors whose certifications
were suspended, revoked, denied, or who were otherwise disciplined;
2. The reasons for the imposition of suspensions, revocations, denials, or other discipline; and
3. Suggestions for improvement of the concealed deadly weapon applicant training program and
instructor process;
(i) If a concealed deadly weapon license holder is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or enters an Alford plea to
a felony offense, then his or her concealed deadly weapon license shall be forthwith revoked by the
Department of Kentucky State Police as a matter of law;

CHAPTER 59 19
(j) If a concealed deadly weapon instructor or instructor trainer is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or enters
an Alford plea to a felony offense, then his or her concealed deadly weapon instructor certification or
concealed deadly weapon instructor trainer certification shall be revoked by the Department of Criminal
Justice Training as a matter of law; and
(k) The following shall be in effect:
1. Action to eliminate the firearms instructor trainer program is prohibited. The program shall
remain in effect, and no firearms instructor trainer shall have his or her certification reduced to
that of certified firearms instructor;
2. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall revoke the concealed deadly weapon license of
any person who received no firearms training as required by KRS 237.126 and administrative
regulations, or who received insufficient training as required by KRS 237.128 and administrative
regulations, if the person voluntarily admits nonreceipt of training or admits receipt of
insufficient training, or if either nonreceipt of training or receipt of insufficient training is proven
following a hearing conducted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13B.
Section 8. KRS 248.664 is amended to read as follows:
Before distribution of the funds, a list of individuals or entities that are awarded tobacco settlement moneys from the
tobacco settlement agreement fund under KRS 248.654, or related state or federal legislation, shall be forwarded by
the cabinet, agency, corporation, authority, or other entity responsible for the distribution of the moneys to all
designees of the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] for the administration of
the child support program.
Section 9. KRS 403.135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If another section of this chapter or KRS 407.5311 or 407.5602 requires the provision of a personal identifier
in a pleading, document, or exhibit filed with the court, the party making the filing shall provide the personal
identifier in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.
(2) The clerk of the court shall allow the unredacted sealed copy of the pleading, document, or exhibit containing
personal identifiers to be accessed only by a party to the case, an attorney of record in the case, a judge of the
court or other authorized court personnel, a duly authorized employee or agent of the Office of the Attorney
General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] involved in child support matters attendant to the case, or a
person authorized to view the copy by specific order of the court.
(3) As used in this section, "personal identifier" means a Social Security number, name of minor child, date of
birth, or financial account number.
Section 10. KRS 405.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any sale or conveyance made to a purchaser with notice or for the benefit of any religious society, if made in
fraud or hindrance of the right of wife or child to maintenance, shall be void as against the wife or child.
(2) In any case where an obligor transfers income or property to avoid payment to a child support creditor, the
transfer shall be indicia of fraud. Indicia of fraud creates a prima facie case that the transfer of income or
property was to avoid payment of child support. Indicia of fraud shall be set forth by administrative regulation.
(3) In any case in which the Office of the Attorney General[cabinet] knows of a transfer by a child support
obligor with respect to which a prima facie case is established, the Office of the Attorney General[cabinet]
shall:
(a) Seek to void the transfer; or
(b) Obtain a settlement in the best interests of the child support creditor.
Section 11. KRS 405.411 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of the Attorney General's designee under KRS 15.802(6) for the administration of child support
may compile a list of the names of persons under its jurisdiction who have a child support arrearage that equals
or exceeds six (6) months without payment, or fail, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with
subpoenas or warrants relating to paternity or child support proceedings as provided by 42 U.S.C. sec.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
666(a)(16). The Office of the Attorney General may furnish this list to the newspaper of general circulation in
that county for publication.
(2) The Department of Child Support Services[for Income Support, Child Support Enforcement,] in the
Department of Law[Office of the Attorney General] shall determine uniform standards for publication. The
Office of the Attorney General is authorized to promulgate the necessary administrative regulations under
KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section.
(3) For purposes of this section, "newspaper of general circulation" means a publication bearing a title or name,
regularly issued at least as frequently as once a week for a definite price, having a second-class mailing
privilege, being not less than four (4) pages, published continuously during the immediately preceding one (1)
year period, which is published for the dissemination of news of general interest, and is circulated generally in
the political subdivision in which it is published and in which notice is to be given. In any county where a
publication fully complying with this definition does not exist, the Office of the Attorney General may publish
this list in the publication utilized by the Circuit Court Clerk of the county for publication of other legal
notices in the county. A newspaper that is not engaged in the distribution of news of general interest to the
public, but that is primarily engaged in the distribution of news of interest to a particular group of citizens, is
not a newspaper of general circulation.
Section 12. KRS 405.430 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a parent presents himself to the Office of the Attorney General for the voluntary establishment of
paternity and clear evidence of parentage is not present, the office shall pay when administratively ordered the
cost of genetic testing to establish paternity, subject to recoupment from the alleged father when paternity is
established.
(2) The Office of the Attorney General shall obtain additional testing in any case if an original test is contested,
upon request and advance payment by the contestant.
(3) In a contested paternity case, the child, the mother, and the putative father shall submit to genetic testing upon
a request of any of the parties, unless the person or guardian of the person who is requested to submit to
genetic testing shows good cause, taking into account the best interests of the child, why the genetic tests
cannot be performed. The request shall be supported by a sworn statement of the party, requesting that the test
be performed, which shall include the information required by 42 U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(5)(B)(i) or (ii).
(4) When a parent who fails to support a child is not obligated to provide child support by court order, the Office
of the Attorney General may administratively establish a child support obligation based upon a voluntary
acknowledgment of paternity as set forth in KRS Chapter 406, the parent's minimum monthly child support
obligation and proportionate share of child care costs incurred due to employment or job search of either
parent, or incurred while receiving elementary or secondary education, or higher education or vocational
training which will lead to employment. The monthly child support obligation shall be determined pursuant to
the Kentucky child support guidelines set forth in KRS 403.212 or 403.2122. The actual cost of child care
shall be reasonable and shall be allocated between the parents in the same proportion as each parent's gross
income, as determined under the guidelines, bears to the total family gross income.
(5) The Office of the Attorney General shall recognize a voluntary acknowledgment of paternity as a basis for
seeking a support order, irrespective of the alleged father's willingness to consent to a support order.
(6) When in the best interest of the child, the Office of the Attorney General may review and adjust a parent's
child support obligation or child care obligation as established by the office, upon a request of the office when
an assignment has been made, or upon either parent's petition if the amount of the child support awarded under
the order differs from the amount that would be awarded in accordance with KRS 403.212 or 403.2122. The
Office of the Attorney General shall notify parents at least once every three (3) years of the right to a review.
(7) In establishing or modifying a parent's monthly child support obligation, the Office of the Attorney General
may use automated methods to identify orders eligible for review, conduct the review, identify orders eligible
for adjustment, and apply the adjustment to eligible orders in accordance with KRS 403.212 or 403.2122. The
office shall utilize information, including financial records, about the parent and child which it has good reason
to believe is reliable and may require the parents to provide income verification.
(8) In cases in which past-due support is owed for a child receiving public assistance under Title IV-A of the
Federal Social Security Act, the Office of the Attorney General shall issue an administrative order, or seek a
judicial order, requiring the obligated parent to participate in work activities, or educational or vocational

CHAPTER 59 21
training activities for at least twenty (20) hours per week, unless the parent is incapacitated as defined by 42
U.S.C. sec. 607.
(9) The Office of the Attorney General may disclose financial records only for the purpose of establishing,
modifying, or enforcing a child support obligation of an individual. A financial institution shall not be liable to
any individual for disclosing any financial record of the individual to the office attempting to establish,
modify, or enforce a child support obligation.
(10) The Office of the Attorney General may issue both intrastate and interstate administrative subpoenas to any
individual or entity for financial or other information or documents which are needed to establish, modify, or
enforce a child support obligation pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 651 et seq.
An administrative subpoena lawfully issued in another state to an individual or entity residing in this state shall
be honored and enforced in the Circuit Court of the county in which the individual or entity resides.
(11) In any case where a person or entity fails to respond to a subpoena within the specified time frame, the Office
of the Attorney General[cabinet] shall impose a penalty.
(12) No person shall knowingly make, present, or cause to be made or presented to an employee or officer of the
Office of the Attorney General[cabinet] any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement, representation, or entry
in any application, report, document, or financial record used in determining child support or child care
obligations.
(13) If a person knowingly or by reason of negligence discloses a financial record of an individual, that individual
may pursue civil action for damages in a federal District Court or appropriate state court. No liability shall
arise with respect to any disclosure which results from a good faith, but erroneous, interpretation. In any civil
action brought for reason of negligence of disclosure of financial records, upon finding of liability on the part
of the defendant, the defendant shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to:
(a) The sum of the greater of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each act of unauthorized disclosure of
financial records; or
(b) The sum of the actual damages sustained by the plaintiff resulting from the unauthorized disclosure;
plus
(c) If willful disclosure or disclosure was a result of gross negligence, punitive damages, plus the costs,
including attorney fees, of the action.
(14) The Office of the Attorney General shall issue an administrative order or seek a judicial order requiring a
parent with a delinquent child support obligation, as defined by administrative regulation promulgated under
KRS 15.055, to participate in the program described in KRS 15.816 to help low-income, noncustodial parents
find and keep employment unless the parent is incapacitated as defined by 42 U.S.C. sec. 607.
Section 13. KRS 405.440 is amended to read as follows:
The notice of a minimum monthly support obligation shall be served in person or by certified mail, return receipt
requested, and shall include at least the following:
(1) The name of the child for whom the support obligation is owed;
(2) The amount of the support debt accrued or accruing;
(3) A statement that the parent's earnings and property, both real and personal, are subject to judicial and
administrative enforcement;
(4) That the parent[he] may dispute the obligation amount or any other matter contained in the notice by
requesting a dispute hearing within twenty (20) days;
(5) That, unless there is good cause as determined by the Office of the Attorney General[secretary] for the
parent's[his] failure to request a hearing, if the parent[he] does not request a hearing, his or her agreement
will be presumed and the first payment will be due twenty (20) days after receipt of the notice; and
(6) That if the parent[he] requests a hearing and fails to appear, the hearing officer shall affirm the determination
of minimum monthly support obligation.
Section 14. KRS 405.465 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) This section shall apply only to those child support, medical support, maintenance, and medical support
insurance orders that are established, modified, or enforced by the Office of the Attorney General or those
court orders obtained in administering Part D, Title IV of the Federal Social Security Act.
(2) All child support orders and medical support insurance orders being established, modified, or enforced by the
Office of the Attorney General, or those orders obtained pursuant to the administration of Part D, Title IV of
the Federal Social Security Act, shall provide for income withholding which shall begin immediately.
(3) The court shall order either or both parents who are obligated to pay child support, medical support, or
maintenance under this section to assign to the Office of the Attorney General that portion of salary or wages
of the parent due and to be due in the future as will be sufficient to pay the child support amount ordered by
the court.
(4) The order shall be binding upon the employer or any subsequent employer upon the service by certified mail
of a copy of the order upon the employer and until further order of the court. The employer may deduct the
sum of one dollar ($1) for each payment made pursuant to the order.
(5) The employer shall notify the Office of the Attorney General when an employee, for whom a wage
withholding is in effect, terminates employment and provide the terminated employee's last known address and
the name and address of the terminated employee's new employer, if known.
(6) (a) An employer with twenty (20) or more employees shall notify in writing the Office of the Attorney
General, or its designee administering the support order, of any lump-sum payment of any kind of one
hundred fifty dollars ($150) or more to be made to an employee under a wage withholding order. An
employer with twenty (20) or more employees shall notify in writing the Office of the Attorney General
or its designee no later than forty-five (45) days before the lump-sum payment is to be made or, if the
employee's right to the lump-sum payment is determined less than forty-five (45) days before it is to be
made, the date on which that determination is made. After notification, the employer shall hold each
lump-sum payment of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or more for thirty (30) days after the date on
which it would otherwise be paid to the employee and, on order of the court, pay all or a specified
amount of the lump-sum payment to the Department of Child Support Services[for Income Support,
Child Support Enforcement]. The employer may deduct the sum of one dollar ($1) for each payment.
(b) As used in this subsection, "lump-sum payment of any kind" means a lump-sum payment of earnings as
defined in KRS 427.005.
(7) Any assignment made pursuant to court order shall have priority as against any attachment, execution, or other
assignment, unless otherwise ordered by the court.
(8) No assignment under this section by an employee shall constitute grounds for dismissal of the obligor, refusal
to employ, or taking disciplinary action against any obligor subject to withholding required by this section.
Section 15. KRS 405.991 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person or corporation violating the provisions of KRS 405.465 or 405.467 shall be fined not more than
five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both.
(2) A person who violates KRS 405.490(2) shall pay the Office of the Attorney General[cabinet] the value of the
property ordered to be held or the delinquent child support, whichever is less[lesser], plus interest[ thereon] at
the legal rate for judgments, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) A person who violates KRS 405.430(12) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and, in addition to any
other penalties provided by law, shall be responsible for payment of any difference between the amount of
child support calculated using the correct information and the prior calculation using the false information.
Section 16. KRS 406.021 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Paternity may be determined upon the complaint of the mother, putative father, child, person, or agency
substantially contributing to the support of the child. The action shall be brought by the county attorney or by
the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] or its designee upon the request
of complainant authorized by this section.
(2) Paternity may be determined by the District Court when the mother and father of the child, either:
(a) Submit affidavits in which the mother states the name and Social Security number of the child's father
and the father admits paternity of the child; or

CHAPTER 59 23
(b) Give testimony before the District Court in which the mother states the name and Social Security
number of the child's father and the father admits paternity of the child.
(3) If paternity has been determined or has been acknowledged according to the laws of this state, the liabilities of
the noncustodial parent may be enforced in the same or other proceedings by the mother, child, person, or
agency substantially contributing to the cost of pregnancy, confinement, education, necessary support, or
funeral expenses. Bills for testing, pregnancy, and childbirth without requiring third party foundation
testimony shall be regarded as prima facie evidence of the amount incurred. An action to enforce the liabilities
of the noncustodial parent shall be brought by the county attorney upon the request of such complainant
authorized by this section. An action to enforce the liabilities of the cost of pregnancy, birthing costs, child
support, and medical support shall be brought by the county attorney or by the Office of the Attorney
General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] or its designee.
(4) Voluntary acknowledgment of paternity pursuant to KRS 213.046 shall create a rebuttable presumption of
paternity.
(5) Upon a showing of service of process on the defendant and if the defendant has made no pleading to the court
or has not moved to enter evidence pursuant to KRS 406.091, the court shall order paternity to be established
by default.
Section 17. KRS 406.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If paternity has been determined under the provisions of subsection (1) or (2) of KRS 406.021, the court shall
make a written order of paternity.
(2) Information concerning this action received or transmitted shall not be published or be open for public
inspection, including where the Office of the Attorney General[cabinet] determines reasonable evidence of
domestic violence or child abuse, if the disclosure of the information could be harmful to the custodial parent
or the child of the parent.
(3) Such orders are to be kept separately and shall not be open for public inspection except that they may be
inspected by employees of governmental agencies in the performance of their duties, all law enforcement
agencies including county attorneys, Commonwealth's attorneys, District and Circuit Judges, and anyone else
under order of the court expressly permitting inspection. Either party to an action under this chapter or
attorneys of a party to an action under this chapter shall be permitted to inspect the order entered in the action
to which he or she is a party.
Section 18. KRS 406.091 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An unchallenged acknowledgment of paternity shall be ratified under KRS Chapter 213 without the
requirement for judicial or administrative proceedings. If a genetic test is required, the court shall direct that
inherited characteristics be determined by appropriate testing procedures, and shall appoint an expert qualified
as an examiner of genetic markers to analyze and interpret results and to report to the court.
(2) In a contested paternity case, the child and all other parties shall submit to genetic testing upon a request of
any such party which shall be supported by a sworn statement of the party, except for good cause.
(3) Genetic test results are admissible and shall be weighed along with other evidence of the alleged father's
paternity.
(4) Any objection to genetic testing results shall be made in writing to the court within twenty (20) days of receipt
of genetic test results. If the results of genetic tests or the expert's analysis of inherited characteristics is
disputed, the court, upon reasonable request of a party, shall order that an additional test be made by the same
laboratory or independent laboratory at the expense of the party requesting additional testing. If no objection is
made, the test results are admissible as evidence of paternity without the need for foundation testimony or
other proof of authenticity or accuracy.
(5) Verified documentation of the chain of custody in transmitting the blood specimens is competent evidence to
establish the chain of custody.
(6) A verified expert's report shall be admitted at trial unless the expert is called by a party or the court as a
witness to testify to his or her findings.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) Except where the Office of the Attorney General[Cabinet for Health and Family Services] administratively
orders genetic testing, all costs associated with genetic testing shall be paid by the party who requested that the
action be brought pursuant to KRS 406.021.
(8) When administratively ordered, the Office of the Attorney General[cabinet] shall pay the cost of genetic
testing to establish paternity, subject to recoupment from the alleged father when paternity is established. The
Office of the Attorney General[cabinet] shall obtain additional testing in any case if an original test is
contested, upon request and advance payment by the contestant.
Section 19. KRS 407.440 is amended to read as follows:
If the Office of the Attorney General[secretary for health and family services] or its[his] authorized representative is
of the opinion that a support order is erroneous and presents a question of law warranting an appeal in the public
interest, the Office of the Attorney General[he] may perfect an appeal to the proper appellate court if the support
order was issued by a court of this state, or if the support order was issued in another state, cause the appeal to be
taken in the other state. In either case, expenses of appeal may be paid on the[his] order of the Attorney General
from funds appropriated for his or her office.
Section 20. KRS 205.231 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary] shall appoint one (1) or
more impartial hearing officers to hear and decide upon appealed decisions.
(2) Any applicant or recipient who is dissatisfied with the decision or delay in action on his or her application for
public assistance or the amount granted to him or her and any applicant or recipient who was deemed
ineligible or disqualified from public assistance benefits under KRS 205.193 or 205.200 may appeal to the
cabinet[a hearing officer], except that an appeal and a hearing need not be granted if the sole issue is a federal
or state law requiring an automatic change adversely affecting some or all recipients of the Kentucky medical
assistance program so long as advance notice of the change, with an explanation of appeal rights, is provided
to all affected recipients. However, a recipient may appeal whether the cabinet is accurately interpreting a
change in federal or state law which may adversely affect the recipient. On receipt of an appeal, an
administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(3) The secretary may appoint an Appeal Board for Public Assistance composed of the secretary and two (2) other
members. The secretary shall be chairman, and he or she and one (1) other member constitute a quorum.
(4) Any applicant or recipient who is dissatisfied with the decision of a hearing officer may appeal to the appeal
board in the manner and form prescribed by administrative regulation. The board may on its own motion
affirm, modify, or set aside any decision of a hearing officer on the basis of the evidence previously submitted
in the case, or direct the taking of additional evidence, or may permit any of the parties to the decision to
initiate further appeals before it. The board may remove itself or transfer to another hearing officer the
proceedings on any appeal pending before a hearing officer. The board shall promptly notify the parties to any
proceedings of its findings and decisions.
(5) The manner in which appeals are presented and hearings and appeals conducted under subsection (4) of this
section shall be in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary.
(6) After a decision by the appeal board, any party aggrieved by the decision may seek judicial review of the
decision by filing a petition in the Circuit Court of the county in which the petitioner resides, in accordance
with KRS 13B.140, 13B.150, and 13B.160.
Section 21. KRS 205.646 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative appeals hearing" means a formal adjudicatory proceeding conducted by the Office of
Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[administrative hearing tribunal of the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services] in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Department" means the Department for Medicaid Services;
(c) "External independent third-party review" means a review performed by an independent third party
outside of the Medicaid managed care organization's internal appeal process pursuant to administrative
regulations promulgated by the department;
(d) "Medicaid managed care organization" means an entity for which the Department for Medicaid
Services has contracted to serve as a managed care organization as defined in 42 C.F.R. sec. 438.2; and

CHAPTER 59 25
(e) "Provider" means any person or entity licensed in Kentucky as defined in KRS 304.17A-700(9) that
provides covered services to enrollees.
(2) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a provider who has exhausted the written internal appeals process of
a Medicaid managed care organization shall be entitled to an external independent third-party review of the
Medicaid managed care organization's final decision that denies, in whole or in part, a health care service to an
enrollee or a claim for reimbursement to a provider for a health care service rendered by the provider to an
enrollee of the Medicaid managed care organization. A provider may submit multiple claims to be appealed in
a single external independent third-party review if the provider alleges that a Medicaid managed care
organization has implemented a policy or practice that results in the denial, in whole or in part, of those claims.
(3) A Medicaid managed care organization's letter to a provider reflecting the final decision of the provider's
internal appeal shall include:
(a) A statement that the provider's internal appeal rights within the Medicaid managed care organization
have been exhausted;
(b) A statement that the provider is entitled to an external independent third-party review; and
(c) The time period and address to request an external independent third-party review.
(4) A Medicaid managed care organization or provider shall be entitled to appeal a final decision of the external
independent third-party review to the Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of
Law[administrative hearing tribunal within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services] for an administrative
hearing to be held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. An appeal shall be filed within thirty (30) days from
the appealing party's receipt of the final decision of the external independent third-party review. A decision of
the Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[administrative hearing tribunal] shall be
final for purposes of judicial appeal. Any appeal of a final decision of an external independent third-party
review involving the submission of multiple claims as allowed under subsection (2) of this section shall be
conducted as a single administrative hearing under this subsection.
(5) [Within one hundred twenty (120) days after April 8, 2016, ]The department shall promulgate administrative
regulations to implement the external independent third-party review as required by this section.
(6) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish reasonable fees, not to exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000), to defray expenses associated with an administrative hearing that shall be paid by
the party who does not prevail in the administrative hearing. If the administrative hearing is an appeal of a
final decision of an external independent third-party review involving the submission of multiple claims as
allowed under subsection (2) of this section, only one (1) fee shall be assessed under this subsection against
the party who does not prevail.
(7) This section shall apply to all contracts or master agreements between Medicaid managed care organizations
and the Commonwealth of Kentucky entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2016.
Section 22. KRS 210.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At the beginning of each fiscal year, the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall allocate
available funds to the boards for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability or nonprofit
organizations for disbursement during the fiscal year in accordance with approved plans and budgets. The
secretary shall, from time to time during the fiscal year, review the operations, budgets, and expenditures of
the various programs; and if funds are not needed for a program to which they were allocated or if the board
has failed to pay employer contributions for which it is liable by its participation in the Kentucky Employees
Retirement System, he or she may, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, withdraw any funds
that are unencumbered and reallocate them to other programs. He may withdraw funds from any program, or
component part thereof:
(a) Which is not being operated and administered in accordance with its approved plan and budget, and the
policies and administrative regulations of the cabinet promulgated pursuant to KRS 210.370 to 210.480;
or
(b) If the board has failed to pay employer contributions for which it is liable by its participation in the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System.
(2) If the secretary finds at any time that a board for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability or
nonprofit organization to which funds have been allocated for the operation of a regional community program
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability is not operating and administering its program in
compliance and accordance with the approved plan and budget and the policies and administrative regulations
of the cabinet, or if the board has failed to pay employer contributions for which it is liable by its participation
in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or if the board has filed for bankruptcy, he or she may
withdraw his or her recognition of that board or organization as the local authority for the receipt of funds and
the operation and administration of regional community programs for mental health or individuals with an
intellectual disability.
(3) If the secretary finds at any time that an emergency situation exists with regard to the financial stability of any
regional board for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability or nonprofit organization,
including a regional board's inability to pay employer contributions to the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System or a regional board's actions to file for bankruptcy, which jeopardizes the continuation of programs and
provision of services in the area served by that board or nonprofit organization, he or she may, other statutes to
the contrary notwithstanding:
(a) Appoint a caretaker administrator who shall be authorized to direct the operation and administration of
the board or nonprofit organization's community programs for mental health or individuals with an
intellectual disability including, but not limited to, their financial record keeping, their personnel
management operations, and their financial and program reporting; and
(b) Make personnel changes deemed necessary to insure the continued operation of the board or nonprofit
organization in compliance with its plan and budget and the policies and regulations of the cabinet.
(4) Any community board for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability to be affected by the
provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be notified by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services thirty (30) days prior to the anticipated action by the secretary. The notification shall be
by means of a letter from the secretary to the chairman of the board for mental health or individuals with an
intellectual disability in question and shall state the reasons for the anticipated action. Following the
notification, the board for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability may:
(a) Comply with the secretary's action without contesting it; or
(b) Request an administrative hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the Office of Administrative
Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary] to show cause why the action should not stand. The
application shall be made within seven (7) days of the receipt of the letter from the secretary, and the
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 23. KRS 210.270 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services is authorized to designate those private homes,
private nursing homes, and private institutions that he or she deems, after a thorough investigation of the
personal and financial qualifications of the owners and tenants, the facilities and management, and the
desirability of the location of the homes, suitable for the placement of patients, including individuals with
mental illness or an intellectual disability of all ages, outside of the state mental hospitals. The secretary of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services may promulgate, by administrative regulation, standards for the
selection and operation of private homes, private nursing homes, and private institutions designated for the
placement of patients. No home of an officer or employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or of
a member of his or her immediate family shall be designated for the placement of patients.
(2) Whenever the staff of a state mental hospital has determined that a patient who is not being held on an order
arising out of a criminal offense has sufficiently improved and is not dangerous to himself, herself, or other
persons, and that it would be in the patient's best interest to be placed outside of the hospital in a private home
or private nursing home, the hospital shall so certify and authorize the patient to be transferred to a designated
private home or private nursing home for care and custody for a length of time that the hospital deems
advisable.
(3) No patient with an intellectual disability lodged in a state institution may have his or her level of care
reclassified nor may the patient[he] be transferred to a private nursing home or other private institution
without first providing ten (10) days' notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the patient's parents
or guardian that a reclassification of the patient's level of care or a transfer in the place of residence is being
considered.
(4) Any parent or guardian of any patient with an intellectual disability lodged in a state institution may participate
in any evaluation procedure which may result in a reclassification of the patient's level of care or in a transfer

CHAPTER 59 27
in the place of residence of the patient. Participation may include the submission by the parents or guardian of
medical evidence or any other evidence deemed relevant by the parents or guardian to the possible
reclassification or transfer of the patient.
(5) If the decision to reclassify or transfer any patient with an intellectual disability is adverse to the best interests
of the patient as expressed by the parents or guardian, they shall be given notice by certified mail, return
receipt requested, that they are entitled to a thirty (30) day period from the receipt of such notice to file with
the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services a notice of appeal and application for a hearing.
Upon receipt of an application for a hearing, a hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter
13B.
(6) The appeal shall be heard by a three (3) member panel composed of a designated representative of the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services, a designated representative of the state institution where the patient with an
intellectual disability is presently lodged, and a designated neutral representative appointed by the county
judge/executive of the county in which[wherein] the institution in question is located. The Office of
Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary] may appoint a hearing officer to preside
over the conduct of the hearing.
(7) Decisions made by the panel may be appealed to the Circuit Court of the county in which the state institution
in question is located, to the Circuit Court of the county in which either of the parents or guardians or
committee of the patient in question is domiciled at the time of the decision, or to Franklin Circuit Court in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(8) All parents or guardians or committee of a patient with an intellectual disability lodged in a state institution
shall be fully apprised by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of their rights and duties under the
provisions of subsections (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section.
(9) The provisions of KRS 210.700 to 210.760 shall apply to patients transferred to designated private homes and
private nursing homes as though the patients were residing in a state mental hospital.
Section 24. KRS 205.915 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within thirty (30) days of any recommendation of any decision by the cabinet, an aggrieved party may appeal.
The Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary] shall appoint one (1) or
more trained hearing officers to hear and decide the appeal.
(2) Any party who is dissatisfied with the decision of the hearing officer may appeal to the appeal board. The
board may on its own motion affirm, modify or set aside any decision of a hearing officer on the basis of
evidence previously submitted or may direct the taking of additional evidence or may permit any party to
initiate further appeals before it. The board shall notify promptly the parties of its findings and decisions.
(3) The manner in which appeals are presented and hearings and appeals conducted shall be in accordance with
regulations prescribed by the secretary for determining the rights of parties, such hearings to be conducted in a
summary manner. A complete record shall be kept of all proceedings in connection with any appeal. All
testimony at any hearing upon an appeal shall be recorded either stenographically, electronically, or
mechanically. No hearing officer or member of the board shall participate in any hearing in which he or she is
an interested party.
Section 25. KRS 211.090 is amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall:
(1) Appoint county and district boards of health pursuant to KRS 212.020 and 212.850;
(2) [Hear and decide appeals from rulings, decisions and actions of the cabinet, where the aggrieved party makes
written request therefor to the secretary within thirty (30) days after the ruling, decision or action complained
of;
(3) ]Establish[Adopt] rules and promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
necessary to regulate and control all matters set forth in KRS 211.180 to the extent the regulation and control
of same have not been delegated to some other agency of the Commonwealth and establish and adopt such
other rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and any other law
relating to public health, except as otherwise provided by law;
(3)[(4)] Issue or deny hospital licenses;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4)[(5)] Approve or disapprove the establishment of proposed hospital service corporations and contracts for
hospital service corporations and contracts for hospital services pursuant to KRS 304.32-030;
(5)[(6)] Approve or disapprove of the establishment of proposed medical service plan corporations and contract
for medical services pursuant to KRS 304.32-050, 304.32-140, and 304.32-160;
(6)[(7)] Enforce the provisions of KRS 311.250, 311.260, 311.375, 311.376.
Section 26. KRS 216.567 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The manner in which appeals are presented from any decision on ratings, citations, or penalties pursuant to
KRS 216.537 to 216.590 shall be in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(2) The Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary] shall appoint one (1) or
more impartial hearing officers to hear and decide upon appealed decisions and notices of transfer or
discharge. The decision of the hearing officer shall be the final order of the cabinet.
(3) Any party aggrieved by a final order may seek judicial review by filing a petition in the Franklin Circuit Court
in accordance with KRS 13B.140 and 13B.150.
Section 27. KRS 216B.105 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall operate any health facility in this Commonwealth
without first obtaining a license issued by the cabinet, which license shall specify the kind or kinds of health
services the facility is authorized to provide. A license shall not be transferable and shall be issued for a
specific location and, if specified, a designated geographical area.
(2) The cabinet may deny, revoke, modify, or suspend a license in any case in which it finds that there has been a
substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated
hereunder. The denial, revocation, modification, or suspension shall be effected by mailing to the applicant or
licensee, by certified mail or other method of delivery which may include electronic service, a notice setting
forth the particular reasons for the action. The denial, revocation, modification, or suspension shall become
final and conclusive thirty (30) days after notice is given, unless the applicant or licensee, within the thirty (30)
day period, shall file a request in writing for a hearing with the cabinet.
(3) The hearing shall be before a person designated to serve as hearing officer by the Office of Administrative
Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary].
(4) Within thirty (30) days from the conclusion of the hearing, the findings and recommendations of the hearing
officer shall be transmitted to the cabinet, with a synopsis of the evidence contained in the record and a
statement of the basis of the hearing officer's findings. The applicant or licensee shall be entitled to be
represented at the hearing in person or by counsel, or both, and shall be entitled to introduce testimony by
witnesses or, if the hearing officer[cabinet] so permits, by depositions. A full and complete record shall be
kept of all hearings, and all testimony shall be reported but need not be transcribed unless the decision is
appealed pursuant to this chapter. The cabinet may adopt the hearing officer's findings and recommendations
or prepare written findings of fact and state the basis for its decision which shall become part of the record of
the proceedings.
(5) All decisions revoking, suspending, modifying or denying licenses shall be made by the cabinet in writing.
The cabinet shall notify the applicant or licensee of the decision.
(6) The decision of the cabinet shall be final for purposes of judicial appeal upon notice of the cabinet's decision.
Section 28. KRS 216B.085 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Any time ]No later than fifteen (15) days after the date the review commences, any affected person may
request a public hearing. Hearings shall be before a person designated by the Office of Administrative
Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary] to serve as hearing officer. The hearing officer shall be
authorized to administer oaths, issue subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, and all necessary process in the
proceedings.
(2) If a hearing is requested, the Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary]
shall set a date, time, and place for a public hearing. Reasonable notice of the hearing shall be given to all
affected persons in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.
(3) At the hearing, any party to the proceedings shall have the right to be represented by counsel, and to present
oral or written arguments and evidence relevant to the matter which is the subject of the hearing, and may

CHAPTER 59 29
conduct reasonable cross-examination under oath of persons who make factual allegations relevant to such
matters. A full and complete record shall be maintained of the hearing.
(4) Any decision of the cabinet to issue or deny a certificate of need shall be based solely on the record established
with regard to the matter. All decisions granting, denying, or modifying a certificate of need shall be made by
the cabinet in writing. The cabinet shall notify the parties to the proceedings of the decision and the decision
shall be final for purposes of judicial appeal unless a request for reconsideration is filed. An approved
certificate of need shall be issued forty (40) days after notice of the cabinet's decision unless a request for
reconsideration is filed or a judicial appeal is taken and issuance is enjoined by the court.
Section 29. KRS 216B.086 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet may revoke a certificate of need, or portion thereof, for failure of the holder of the certificate to
implement the project in accordance with timetables and standards for implementation established by
administrative regulation of the cabinet; however, for projects involving long-term care beds, the cabinet may
revoke any certificate granted which is not implemented within twenty-four (24) months or within any six (6)
month reporting interval during which there is not satisfactory progress in meeting the project timetable and
shall revoke any certificate granted which is not implemented within thirty-six (36) months except for those
projects specified as an exception pursuant to Executive Order 96-129 in which case those projects shall be
implemented according to the intervals and timetable set forth in this section, as of the effective date of
Medicaid funding in the biennial budget for those projects. The administrative regulation for projects
involving long-term care beds shall be based on project completion in twenty-four (24) months and shall
specify criteria for measuring implementation of project objectives at six (6) month reporting intervals. If, at
any six (6) month reporting period, the certificate holder is able to show good cause as to why a project failed
to meet its timetables, an extension of six (6) months may be granted to meet that particular timetable. The
burden of proof shall be on the certificate holder. An extension may be granted beyond a total of thirty-six (36)
months, only if the applicant requests that the cabinet grant an additional six (6) month extension beyond the
initial thirty-six (36) month completion period and shows good cause. For purposes of this section, there shall
be deemed to be "good cause" if the project can be completed within the additional six (6) month period. In no
case shall an extension be granted beyond a total of forty-two (42) months. The holder of the certificate of
need shall file with the cabinet the name and business address of all owners, investors, and stockholders in the
project whose ownership interest is greater than ten percent (10%). All reports submitted by the certificate
holder under this subsection shall be considered a public record in accordance with the Kentucky Open
Records Law, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(2) The cabinet shall give notice to the holder of the certificate of its initial decision to revoke the certificate of
need or portion thereof. The cabinet's initial decision to revoke a certificate of need or portion thereof shall
become final after thirty (30) days unless a hearing is requested. The secretary shall give notice to the holder of
the certificate of a decision which has become final under the provisions of this subsection.
(3) The holder of the certificate of need to be revoked may request in writing a public hearing in respect to an
initial decision by the cabinet to revoke a certificate of need within thirty (30) days of the date of notice of the
initial decision. Failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of any right to reconsideration or judicial
appeal of a final cabinet decision to revoke a certificate of need.
(4) The hearing shall be before a person designated by the Office of Administrative Hearings within the
Department of Law[secretary] to be the hearing officer. The hearing shall be no later than thirty (30) days
after the request for the hearing is filed.
(5) If a hearing is requested, the Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary]
shall set a date, time, and place for a public hearing. Reasonable notice of the hearing shall be given to all
affected persons in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.
(6) At the hearing, any party to the proceedings shall have the right to be represented by counsel and to present
oral or written arguments and evidence relevant to the revocation of the certificate of need and may conduct
reasonable cross-examination under oath of persons who testify. A full and complete record shall be
maintained of the hearing, and all testimony shall be recorded but not be transcribed unless the cabinet's final
decision is appealed pursuant to this chapter.
(7) After the issuance of an initial decision to revoke a certificate of need and before a final decision is made, no
person shall have ex parte contacts with employees of the cabinet regarding the revocation. If an ex parte
contact occurs, it shall be promptly made a part of the record.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

30 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(8) If a hearing is requested after notice of the cabinet's initial decision to revoke a certificate of need, the Office
of Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law[cabinet] shall make a final decision within thirty
(30) days after the hearing. Any final decision revoking a certificate of need shall be made by the hearing
officer[cabinet] in writing. The cabinet shall notify the parties to the proceedings of the final decision.
(9) Any final decision[ of the cabinet] to revoke a certificate of need shall be based solely on the record
established with regard to the revocation.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, reconsideration pursuant to KRS 216B.090 or judicial
appeal pursuant to KRS 216B.115 shall be available with regard to a final decision of the cabinet to revoke a
certificate of need.
Section 30. KRS 216B.106 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall investigate[ and hold hearings on] complaints pertaining to ambulance services licensed
under KRS 311A.030 that are transferred to the cabinet by the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical
Services as required by KRS 311A.055 if the cabinet determines a hearing is needed.
(2) The hearing shall be before a person designated to serve as hearing officer by the Office of Administrative
Hearings within the Department of Law[secretary].
(3) Within thirty (30) days from the conclusion of the hearing, the findings and recommendations of the hearing
officer shall be transmitted to the cabinet, with a synopsis of the evidence contained in the record and a
statement of the basis of the hearing officer's findings. The applicant or licensee shall be entitled to be
represented at the hearing in person or by counsel, or both, and shall be entitled to introduce testimony by
witnesses or, if the cabinet so permits, by depositions. A full and complete record shall be kept of all hearings,
and all testimony shall be reported but need not be transcribed unless the decision is appealed pursuant to this
chapter. The cabinet shall immediately submit the hearing officer's findings and recommendations or the
prepared written findings of fact and statement of the basis for its decision, which shall become part of the
record of the proceedings, to the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services.
(4) The Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services may deny, revoke, modify, or suspend a license in any
case in which the cabinet finds that there has been a substantial failure to comply with the provisions of KRS
311A.030 or the administrative regulations promulgated hereunder. The denial, revocation, modification, or
suspension shall be effected by mailing to the applicant or licensee, by certified mail or other method of
delivery which may include electronic service, a notice setting forth the particular reasons for the action. The
board shall notify the cabinet within five (5) days of its action in response to the cabinet's findings and
recommendations in writing.
(5) The denial, revocation, modification, or suspension shall become final and conclusive thirty (30) days after
notice is given, unless the applicant or licensee, within the thirty (30) day period, files a request in writing for a
hearing with the cabinet. The cabinet shall notify the board of its actions within five (5) days of receiving a
hearing request. All decisions revoking, suspending, modifying, or denying licenses shall be made by the
board in writing. The board shall notify the applicant or licensee of the decision.
(6) The decision of the board shall be final for purposes of judicial appeal upon notice of the board's decision.
Section 31. KRS 199.670 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet may revoke or suspend a license issued under KRS 199.640 for any deficiency or condition which
would have caused a denial of the license in the first instance. The cabinet may refuse to issue a license in any
case where the applicant is not found to meet the standards established by the secretary in an administrative
regulation promulgated in accordance with the provisions of KRS 199.640.
(2) If the cabinet proposes to revoke or suspend, or to refuse to issue a license, written notice shall be given to the
licensee or applicant, stating the proposed action and grounds for the action[therefor], and notifying the
licensee or applicant that the license will be revoked, suspended, or refused unless the applicant or licensee
makes a written request to engage in informal dispute resolution, in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (4) of this section, or the applicant or licensee makes a written request[ for a hearing] to the
cabinet[before the secretary] within thirty (30) days of notice for a hearing before the Office of
Administrative Hearings within the Department of Law. Notice shall be complete and effective upon mailing.
If the cabinet proposes to deny the issuance or renewal of a license, notice of the proposed action shall be
provided to the licensee or applicant no later than thirty (30) days after the application for licensure or renewal
is received by the cabinet.

CHAPTER 59 31
(3) If a request for a hearing is made, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the
cabinet has probable cause to believe that an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare exists, the
cabinet may take emergency action pursuant to KRS 13B.125.
(4) (a) Upon receipt of a statement of deficiency from the cabinet, the applicant or licensee may request one
(1) informal opportunity per survey to dispute any deficiencies with which it disagrees. The applicant or
licensee shall make a written request to the cabinet for informal dispute resolution, which must be
received by the cabinet within ten (10) days of the receipt of the statement of deficiency by the
applicant or licensee. The request shall:
1. Specify the deficiencies in dispute;
2. Provide a detailed explanation of the basis for the dispute;
3. Include any supporting documentation, including any information that was not available at the
time of the survey; and
4. If desired, request a face-to-face meeting with the regional program manager, or the manager's
designee, and a surveyor who did not participate in the original survey or the decision to issue
the disputed deficiency.
(b) Upon receipt of a request for informal dispute resolution, the regional program manager, or the
manager's designee, and a child-caring surveyor who did not participate in the original survey or the
decision to issue the disputed deficiency shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the request, review
the specific deficiencies in dispute and notify the applicant or licensee in writing of the results of the
review. If a face-to-face meeting was requested by the applicant or licensee, the meeting shall be held,
and no decision shall be made regarding the disputed deficiencies until after the face-to-face meeting
has occurred.
1. If materials submitted by the applicant or licensee by mail or at the face-to-face meeting
demonstrate that specific deficiencies should not have been cited, those deficiencies will be
removed from the statement of deficiencies and any enforcement actions imposed solely as a
result of those cited deficiencies will be rescinded.
2. If, after review of the disputed deficiencies, the regional office staff affirms the deficiencies, the
licensee or applicant may accept the findings of the regional office staff and make any
corrections required by the cabinet, or may, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice,
request in writing a meeting with the secretary or the secretary's designee. The secretary may
designate an individual who holds the position of director or above to serve as the designee.
3. The secretary or the secretary's designee shall meet in person with the licensee or applicant and
review the documentation available within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request.
4. If the information provided demonstrates that specific deficiencies should not have been cited,
those deficiencies will be removed from the statement of deficiencies and any enforcement
actions imposed solely as a result of those cited deficiencies will be rescinded.
5. If the secretary or the secretary's designee affirms the deficiencies, the secretary or the secretary's
designee shall, within fifteen (15) days issue a final written order stating the cabinet's final
position regarding the deficiencies in dispute. The decision of the secretary or the secretary's
designee shall be a final order for purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(c) A request for informal dispute resolution shall not delay the required submission of a plan of correction
for any deficiency not in dispute. Any corrective plan of action or similar submission required by the
cabinet relating to any deficiency in dispute shall be suspended until a decision is rendered and a
corrective plan of action is agreed to within the informal dispute resolution process or the secretary or
the secretary's designee issues a final order.
(5) Any final order may be reviewed in the Circuit Court of the county in which the child-caring facility or child-
placing agency is located in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 32. KRS 405.450 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
(1) A hearing officer appointed by the Office of Administrative Hearings within the Department of
Law[secretary] shall conduct dispute hearings in the county of the child or parent's residence or any other
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

32 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
location acceptable to the parent, which shall be scheduled within sixty (60) days of the parent's request for a
hearing. The dispute hearing proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(2) The parent's obligation to pay minimum monthly support shall be stayed until the parent's[his] receipt of the
final order.
(3) The parent or the Office of the Attorney General may file an appeal in the Circuit Court in the county of the
parent's or the child's residence in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(4) The parent shall, during the pendency of the parent's[his] appeal from the final order, absent a showing of
indigency or need exceeding the child's need, pay the minimum monthly support obligation to the office,
which shall, if the parent's appeal is successful, return his or her money together with interest at the legal rate
for judgments.
(5) If the Office of the Attorney General elects to conduct the modification review as specified in KRS
405.430(6), either party may contest the adjustment to the obligation amount within thirty (30) days after the
date of the notice of the adjustment by requesting a review under subsection (1) of this section and, if
appropriate, a request for adjustment of the order as permitted by this chapter.
Section 33. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.